Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; C.J. RAMSTAD/NORTH SHORE STATE TRAIL MASTER PLAN UPDATE.new text end new text begin $25,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the all-terrain vehicle account in the natural resources fund to the commissioner of natural resources to update the C.J. Ramstad/North Shore State Trail Master Plan to allow for all-terrain vehicle use on those portions of the trail that lie within Cook and Lake Counties. By February 1, 2026, the commissioner must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with primary jurisdiction over environment policy and finance on the modifications made to the master plan under this section. new text end